Hawaii statutes.
§665-4 Sale; disposition of proceeds.
If a decree is entered in favor of the State, the department of land and
natural resources shall cause the premises to be sold at public auction, and
the proceeds of sale after deducting all costs and expenses shall be deposited
in the treasury of the State and there abide the claim of any heir or other
person thereto lawfully entitled; provided that no claim to the proceeds shall
be allowed unless the claim is made within five years after deposit. [L 1886, c
8, §4; RL 1925, §2916; RL 1935, §4233; RL 1945, §10244; RL 1955, §235-4; am L
Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §21; am L 1961, c 132, §1; HRS §665-4]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next